Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2432
Special assessment; division or subdivision
of land; reapportionment; procedure; notice; hearing; aggrieved owner; appeal;
governing body; duties.

(1) Whenever a tract of land against which a special assessment
has been levied is divided or subdivided by any platting, replatting, or other
form of division creating separate lots or tracts, the governing body of any
city of the first class, city of the second class, or village which has levied
such special assessments may (a) on application of the owner of any part of
the tract or (b) on its own motion, determine the apportionment of such special
assessment remaining unpaid among the various lots and parcels in the tract
resulting from the division or subdivision. Any such reapportionment shall
be on such fair and equitable terms as the governing body shall determine
after notice and hearing on the reapportionment. No reapportionment of a special
assessment shall be done on a tract of land if a tax sale certificate has
been issued for such tract or if the special assessment being reapportioned
is delinquent.

(2) Notice of
hearing on the reapportionment shall be given by publication one time in a
newspaper published or of general circulation in the city or village not less
than ten days prior to the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be sent by
mail to the owners of record title of each lot or parcel affected by any proposed
or determined reapportionment in the same manner as is required under section
25-520.01.

(3) In making the determination as to reapportionment, the governing
body shall take into consideration its own requirements as to security for
payment of the amounts owing and may, if determined appropriate, allocate
based upon either front footage or square footage or other such method or
reapportionment as may be determined appropriate based upon the facts and
circumstances. No such reapportionment shall result in a reduction or remittance
of the total amount originally assessed and then remaining outstanding and
unpaid. Notice of the reapportionment when determined shall be sent by mail
to the owners of record title of each lot or parcel affected by the reapportionment.

(4) Any notice
required under this section may be waived in writing by any owner of any lot
or parcel affected by any reapportionment.

(5) Any owner of real property who feels
aggrieved by the reapportionment of any special assessment under this section
may appeal such reapportionment in the same manner as applies for appeals
from special assessments under sections 19-2422 to 19-2425, but only matters
related to such reapportionment shall be considered upon any such appeal.

(6) The governing body
shall file notice of any reapportionment of a special assessment with the
county treasurer of the county where the lot or parcel is located.

Laws 2011, LB309, § 1.